Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.370

Assessments on omitted property—Resolution—Notice.

In case of assessments on omitted property the city or town council shall pass a resolution:

(1) Setting forth that the property therein described was omitted from the assessment;

(2) Notifying all persons who may desire to object thereto to appear at a meeting of the city or town council at a time specified in the resolution and present their objections thereto, and

(3) Directing the proper board, officer, or authority to report to the council at or prior to the date fixed for the hearing the amount which should be borne by each lot, tract, or parcel of land or other property so omitted. The resolution shall be published in all respects as provided for publishing the resolutions for an original assessment.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.370. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 37, part; RRS s 9390, part.]